Utah statutes.
31A-1-104.   Authorization to do insurance business.

A person may not engage in the following without complying with this title:

(1)  do an insurance business as defined under Section 31A-1-301;

(2)  act as an insurance producer or consultant as defined under Section 31A-1-301; or

(3)  engage in insurance adjusting as defined under Section 31A-26-102.

